Louisiana, session 2026, HB373.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1048 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1048. Adult-Use Cannabis Pilot Program Regulation and Enforcement Act
A.(1) This Section shall be known and may be cited as the "Adult-Use
Cannabis Pilot Program Regulation and Enforcement Act".
(2) In an effort to protect the public health, safety and welfare, it is the
purpose of this Section to establish a temporary pilot program designed to test and
evaluate the parameters of the implementation of a permanent adult-use cannabis
program in this state including all of the following:
(a) Testing the practicality of a potential permanent program in a real-world
environment to determine if it works as intended.
Page 1 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1063 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 373
(b) Implementing a temporary pilot program on a smaller scale to help
identify potential challenges, limitations, or risks that could arise before a potential
permanent rollout.
(c) Providing the opportunity to gather real-time feedback and data to assess
the effectiveness of the temporary pilot program and potential permanent program,
as well as identifying any unintended consequences.
(d) Mitigating the risks and exposure by testing the waters on a smaller scale,
rather than committing to a potential permanent implementation that could prove
unsuccessful.
(e) Gathering, measuring, and analyzing the outcomes and results to
determine whether the temporary pilot program or potential permanent program
should be modified or abandoned.
B. As used in this Section, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Adult-use cannabis" means the natural flowering tops, leaves, resins,
and extracts derived from plants of the genus Cannabis, including all parts of the
plant containing naturally occurring THC, cultivated and harvested directly from the
cannabis plant, excluding any cannabinoids or THC derived through synthetic
processes or chemically altered from hemp-derived compounds such as CBD or
other non-THC cannabinoids, that are legally sold to and consumed by adults who
do not participate in the therapeutic use of marijuana program authorized in
accordance with R.S. 40:1046 et seq.
(2) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Health.
(3) "LMMTS" means the Louisiana Medical Marijuana Tracking System,
tracking marijuana from seed to delivery to an approved laboratory, to wholesale to
permitted retailers, to wholesale to another licensed cultivation facility, to delivery
to an authorized researcher, to sale to persons by permitted retailers, or to
destruction.
(4) "Pilot program" means the adult-use cannabis pilot program established
in accordance with this Section.
Page 2 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1063 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 373
(5) "THC" means tetrahydrocannabinol, tetrahydrocannabinolic acid, and
any tetrahydrocannabinol derivative or precursor.
C.(1) The department is authorized to exercise regulatory authority over the
cultivation, extraction, processing, production, transportation, and retail sale of
adult-use cannabis.
(2) For the health, safety, and welfare of the public, the public health sanitary
code rules promulgated by the department pursuant to R.S. 40:1046 et seq. for the
cultivation, extraction, processing, production, transportation, sale, and independent
laboratory testing of therapeutic marijuana shall be followed to implement the
provisions of this Section except for those rules unique and applicable only to
therapeutic marijuana, patients, debilitating conditions, clinicians, and
recommendations.
(3) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit the department
from adopting rules as otherwise provided for in the Administrative Procedure Act.
D.(1) The authority to sell adult-use cannabis shall be limited to the existing
retailer permit holder authorized, in accordance with R.S. 40:1046 et seq., to sell
therapeutic marijuana in each region corresponding to the sets of parishes
comprising, respectively, the administrative regions of the department as those
regions existed on August 1, 2022.
(2) No later than ninety days before the commencement of the pilot program,
each retail permit holder in a region authorized pursuant to R.S. 40:1046 et seq. shall
notify the department of its intent to participate in the pilot program and identify one
retail location in the region that will participate in the pilot program. The designated
retail location may serve qualified patients purchasing recommended marijuana for
therapeutic use and consumers of adult-use cannabis.
(3) If a retail permit holder in a region authorized pursuant to R.S. 40:1046
et seq. declines to participate in the pilot program, the department shall not authorize
that retail permit holder to participate in the pilot program for the duration of the
pilot program. A retail permit holder who declines to participate in the pilot program
Page 3 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1063 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 373
may continue to serve qualified patients purchasing recommended marijuana for
therapeutic use in accordance with R.S. 40:1046 et seq.
(4) Pursuant to R.S. 40:1046 et seq., each retail permit holder has acquired
and maintains all software, hardware, and communications infrastructure necessary
to ensure connectivity to and implementation of the LMMTS. A retail permit holder
who sells adult-use cannabis pursuant to this Section shall comply with the reporting
requirements of the LMMTS, except for those functions of the LMMTS that are
unique and applicable only to therapeutic marijuana, patients, debilitating conditions,
clinicians, and recommendations.
(5) No retail location participating in the pilot program shall sell adult-use
cannabis in accordance with the provisions of this Section to any person under
twenty-one years of age.
E.(1) The authority to cultivate, extract, process, produce, and transport
adult-use cannabis is limited to the licensees authorized in accordance with R.S.
40:1046 et seq. to cultivate, extract, process, produce, and transport therapeutic
marijuana.
(2) No later than ninety days before the commencement of the pilot program,
the licensees authorized to cultivate, extract, process, produce, and transport
therapeutic marijuana pursuant to R.S. 40:1046 et seq. shall notify the department
of its intent to participate in the pilot program. The licensee may cultivate, extract,
process, produce, and transport adult-use cannabis in addition to cultivating,
extracting, processing, producing, and transporting therapeutic marijuana.
(3) If a licensee authorized to cultivate, extract, process, produce, and
transport therapeutic marijuana pursuant to R.S. 40:1046 et seq. declines to
participate in the pilot program, the department shall not authorize that licensee to
participate in the pilot program permit for the duration of the pilot program. The
licensee who declines to participate in the pilot program may continue to cultivate,
extract, process, produce, and transport therapeutic marijuana pursuant to R.S.
40:1046 et seq.
Page 4 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1063 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 373
(4) Pursuant to R.S. 40:1046 et seq., each licensee authorized to cultivate,
extract, process, produce, and transport therapeutic marijuana has acquired and
maintains all software, hardware, and communications infrastructure necessary to
ensure connectivity to and implementation of the LMMTS. Each licensee authorized
to participate in the pilot program to cultivate, extract, process, produce, and
transport adult-use cannabis pursuant to this Section shall comply with the reporting
requirements of the LMMTS.
F.(1) Analyzing, testing, and handling of adult-use cannabis shall be
conducted pursuant to R.S. 40:1046 et seq., and the rules promulgated by the
department for analyzing, testing, and handling therapeutic marijuana.
(2) Prior to analyzing, testing, or handling adult-use cannabis, an applicant
for an adult-use laboratory license shall submit an initial license application on a
form and in a manner prescribed by the department.
(3) Pursuant to R.S. 40:1046 et seq., each authorized laboratory has acquired
and maintains all software, hardware, and communications infrastructure necessary
to ensure connectivity to and implementation of the LMMTS. Each laboratory
authorized pursuant to this Section shall comply with the reporting requirements of
the LMMTS.
G.(1) The department shall issue initial pilot program permits on January 1,
2027. The department shall subsequently issue pilot program permits on July first
and permits shall be effective for a period of one year. Upon each annual renewal
period, a pilot program permit in force shall be renewed by the department for the
next succeeding period upon proper application for renewal and payment of an
annual pilot program permit renewal fee as required by law and the rules and
regulations of the department.
(2) The department shall assess an annual pilot program permit renewal fee
of five thousand dollars for each retail location, each cultivator, and each laboratory
participating in the pilot program.
Page 5 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1063 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 373
H. State and local sales and use tax on the "retail sale" or "sale at retail"
involving adult-use cannabis authorized in accordance with the pilot program shall
apply to all transactions that take place on January 1, 2027, through July 1, 2030.
I. The provisions of R.S. 40:1046(H)(4)(c) shall be suspended and replaced
by this Subsection for the duration of the pilot program. For the duration of the pilot
program, the department shall assess a fee of three and one-half percent of the gross
wholesales of all marijuana, for therapeutic and adult-use, distributed to a therapeutic
retail permit holder or pilot program permit holder. The fee shall be reported and
paid by the licensee participating in the pilot program authorized to cultivate, extract,
process, produce, and transport adult-use cannabis. If a licensee who is authorized
pursuant to R.S. 40:1046 et seq. to cultivate, extract, process, produce, and transport
therapeutic marijuana declines to participate in the pilot program, the licensee shall
continue to report and pay a fee of seven percent of the gross sales of therapeutic
marijuana to the Department of Revenue. All fees shall be collected by the
Department of Revenue and shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 18 of
Subtitle II of Title 47 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950. The Department
of Revenue shall transfer monthly to the state treasury for deposit into the Disability
Services Fund, as established in R.S. 28:826, the amount of revenues collected in
accordance with this Subsection.
J. Unless expressly provided for in this Section, the provisions of this
Section shall not be construed to in any way interfere with or replace any effort,
purpose, limitation, or program implemented pursuant to R.S. 40:1046, et seq.,
including the limitation on no more than a total of thirty retail locations authorized
pursuant to R.S. 40:1046 et seq., with a limit of twenty retail locations authorized to
sell recommended marijuana for therapeutic use pursuant to R.S. 40:1046 et seq., and
up to ten retail locations authorized to sell both recommended marijuana for
therapeutic use pursuant to R.S. 40:1046 et seq. and adult-use cannabis pursuant to
the pilot program, and the limitation on no more than a total of two licensees
Page 6 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1063 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 373
authorized pursuant to R.S. 40:1046 et seq. to cultivate, extract, process, produce,
and transport marijuana.
K. Notwithstanding any local ordinance to the contrary, in any parish where
a therapeutic use marijuana retail location, cultivator, or laboratory is authorized in
accordance with R.S. 40:1046 et seq. and approved by the department to operate
consistent with the local zoning code, participation in the pilot program is deemed
a permissible continuation of existing lawful use under current zoning classifications
and shall not be considered a new or materially different use or change of use under
any local zoning code, regardless of whether such use is explicitly addressed or silent
in the applicable ordinance.
L. The pilot program shall commence January 1, 2027, and terminate July
1, 2030.
Section 2. R.S. 47:305.2(B)(11) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§305.2. Exemption; medical
* * *
B. The following items shall be exempt from the sales and use tax imposed
by any taxing authority:
* * *
(11) The sale of marijuana recommended for therapeutic use by qualified
patients as defined in R.S. 40:1046. R.S. 40:1046; however, this exemption does not
apply to any other "retail sale" or "sale at retail" of marijuana authorized by law.